New Jersey, session 221, A485.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    At the end of a transportation route, the driver assigned to an omnibus shall visually inspect the omnibus to determine that no person with a disability has been left on the omnibus. 2.    In the event that, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, an omnibus driver is found to have left a person with a disability on the omnibus at the end of the drivers route, the drivers commercial motor vehicle driving privilege shall be: a.     suspended for one month, for a first offense; b.    suspended for six months, for a second offense; or c.     permanently revoked, for a third offense. 3.    In the event that a person with a disability, who was left on an omnibus by a driver at the end of the route, is harmed as a result of foreseeable danger and the driver is found, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, to have acted with gross negligence, the omnibus drivers commercial motor vehicle driving privilege shall be permanently revoked. 4.    a.  In the case of a person holding or required to hold a commercial driver license, the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall include in the commissions records any information related to a driver leaving a person with a disability on an omnibus in violation of P.L.    , c.   (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    Any omnibus driver whose commercial motor vehicle driving privilege has been suspended or revoked pursuant to section 2 or section 3 of P.L.    , c.   (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall have information about the suspension or revocation included on the drivers driving record information filed with the Commercial Driver License Information System. 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.